Massachusetts, session 194th, H3051.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The last paragraph of clause Eighteenth A of section 5 of chapter 59 of the
General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the
word “or”, in line 563, the following words:- one year after
SECTION 2. The last paragraph of clause Forty-first A of said section 5 is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “or”, in line 1225, the following words:- one year after
of 1